New York, session 2025-2026, A3455.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 2504 of the public health law, as 2 added by chapter 107 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 3 1. (a) Any person who is eighteen years of age or older, or is the 4 parent of a child or has married, or is a homeless youth as defined in 5 section five hundred thirty-two-a of the executive law, or receives 6 services at an approved runaway and homeless youth crisis services 7 program or a transitional independent living support program as defined 8 in section five hundred thirty-two-a of the executive law, may give 9 effective consent for medical, dental, health and hospital services for 10 themself, and the consent of no other person shall be necessary. 11 (b) A parent, guardian or person in a parental relation to a child 12 under the age of eighteen shall be physically present when any immuniza- 13 tion is administered to such child unless the child: (i) is an emanci- 14 pated minor; (ii) has been living separate and apart from any parent, 15 guardian, or person in a parental relation to the child; (iii) is a 16 runaway youth as defined in section five hundred thirty-two-a of the 17 executive law; (iv) is a homeless youth as defined in section five 18 hundred thirty-two-a of the executive law; (v) is enrolled in a runaway 19 and homeless youth crisis services program; (vi) is in a residential 20 transitional independent living support program pursuant to section five 21 hundred thirty-two-d of the executive law; (vii) is not under the super- 22 vision or control of a parent, custodian, or legal guardian; or (viii) 23 is not in the care and custody of the office of children and family 24 services. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01138-01-5